Arkansas, session 2025, HB1552.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 5-3-203(1), concerning criminal attempt
offenses that are classified as a Class Y felony, is amended to read as
follows:
(1) Class Y felony if the offense attempted is:
(A) capital Capital murder, § 5-10-101;
(B) Aggravated death by delivery, § 5-10-202;
(C) Predatory marketing of fentanyl to minors, § 5-64-421;
or
(D) Trafficking of fentanyl, § 5-64-440;

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Annotated § 5-3-301(b), concerning the
*CEB172*
03-13-2025 14:04:29 CEB172

As Engrossed: S3/13/25 HB1552
classification of criminal solicitation offenses, is amended to add an
additional subdivision to read as follows:
(9) Class Y felony if the offense solicited is:
(A) Aggravated death by delivery, § 5-10-202;
(B) Predatory marketing of fentanyl to minors, § 5-64-421;
or
(C) Trafficking of fentanyl, § 5-64-440.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code Annotated § 5-3-404, concerning the
classification of criminal conspiracy offenses, is amended to add an
additional subdivision to read as follows:
(8) Class Y felony if an object of the conspiracy is commission
of:
(A) Aggravated death by delivery, § 5-10-202;
(B) Predatory marketing of fentanyl to minors, § 5-64-421;
or
(C) Trafficking of fentanyl, § 5-64-440.

/s/Gazaway

















03-13-2025 14:04:29 CEB172